Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1005
Attachment; several and successive orders; issuance to several counties; costs; taxation.

Orders of attachment may be issued to the sheriffs of different counties; and several of them may, at the option of the plaintiff, be issued at the same time or in succession; but such only as have been executed shall be taxed in the costs, unless otherwise directed by the court.

R.S.1867, Code § 202, p. 426;

R.S.1913, § 7736;

C.S.1922, § 8680;

C.S.1929, § 20-1005;

R.S.1943, § 25-1005.

While order of attachment may issue to another county, garnishee summons cannot. Benedict v. T. L. V. Land & Cattle Co., 66 Neb. 236, 92 N.W. 210 (1902).

Several orders of attachment may be issued at the same time, or in succession; but in such case only a simple affidavit is necessary. Thompson v. Stetson, 15 Neb. 112, 17 N.W. 368 (1883).